Wyoming, session 2025, HB0322.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-2-103 and 22-2-121(a)(i) are
amended to read:

22-2-103. Chief election officers.

The secretary of state is the chief election officer for
the state and shall maintain uniformity in the applications
and operations of the election laws of Wyoming. Each county
clerk is the chief election officer for the county, and
HB0322

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0734
shall be subject to rules promulgated by the secretary of
state under this title, as well as any directives issued by
him pursuant to W.S. 22-2-121(a)(i).

22-2-121. Chief election officer to prepare forms;
rules; advice.

(a) In carrying out his responsibilities under title
22, the secretary of state shall prepare:

(i) Written directives and instructions relating
to and based on the election laws, which shall be binding
on the county clerks and other elections administrators;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0322